Utah statutes.
17-27a-104.   Stricter requirements.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a county may enact an ordinance imposing stricter requirements or higher standards than are required by this chapter.

(2)  A county may not impose stricter requirements or higher standards than are required by:

(a)  Section 17-27a-305;

(b)  Section 17-27a-513;

(c)  Section 17-27a-515; and

(d)  Section 17-27a-519.

